Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-3404
Child and Maternal Death Review Act, how cited; child deaths; stillbirths; maternal deaths and severe maternal morbidity; legislative findings and intent.

(1) Sections 71-3404 to 71-3411 shall be known and may be cited as the Child and Maternal Death Review Act.

(2) The Legislature finds and declares that it is in the best interests of the state, its residents, and especially the children of this state that the number and causes of death of children, including stillbirths, in this state be examined. There is a need for a comprehensive integrated review of all child deaths and stillbirths in Nebraska and a system for statewide retrospective review of existing records relating to each child death and stillbirth.

(3) The Legislature further finds and declares that it is in the best interests of the state and its residents that the number and causes of maternal death and severe maternal morbidity in this state be examined. There is a need for a comprehensive integrated review of all maternal deaths and incidents of severe maternal morbidity in Nebraska and a system for statewide retrospective review of existing records relating to each maternal death and incident of severe maternal morbidity.

(4) It is the intent of the Legislature, by creation of the Child and Maternal Death Review Act, to:

(a) Identify trends from the review of past records to prevent future child deaths, stillbirths, maternal deaths, and incidents of severe maternal morbidity from similar causes when applicable;

(b) Recommend systematic changes for the creation of a cohesive method for responding to certain child deaths, stillbirths, maternal deaths, and incidents of severe maternal morbidity; and

(c) When appropriate, cause referral to be made to those agencies as required in section 28-711 or as otherwise required by state law.

Laws 1993, LB 431, § 1;

Laws 2013, LB361, § 1;

Laws 2022, LB741, § 47;

Laws 2023, LB227, § 95.